Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4585.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1246a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the board of a school district or intermediate school district shall not employ a superintendent of the school district or intermediate school district, principal, or other school administrator, or engage an individual as a consultant or contractor to serve in a school administrator role, at a salary that exceeds the greater of the following amounts: (a) Four times the starting salary for a teacher employed by the school district or intermediate school district. (b) Three times the average salary for a teacher employed by the school district or intermediate school district. (2) If an employment contract that provides a salary for any individual described in subsection (1) is in effect as of the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, and if that salary is not in compliance with subsection (1), then subsection (1) does not apply to that school district or intermediate school district with regard to that individual until after the expiration of that employment contract.